Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.280

Supplemental projects.

Except as limited by this section, an authority shall have the same powers with respect to supplemental projects as hereinafter in this section defined as are now or hereafter granted to it under this chapter with respect to housing projects.

No funds shall be expended by an authority for a supplemental project except by resolution adopted on notice at a public hearing as provided by *chapter 42.32 RCW, supported by formal findings of fact incorporated therein, establishing that:

(1) Low-income housing needs within the area of operation of the authority are being or will be adequately met by existing programs; and

(2) A surplus of funds will exist after meeting such low-income housing needs.

Expenditures for supplemental projects shall be limited to those funds determined to be surplus.

"Supplemental project" for the purposes of this chapter shall mean any work or undertaking to provide buildings, land, equipment, facilities, and other real or personal property for recreational, group home, halfway house or other community purposes which by resolution of the housing authority is determined to be necessary for the welfare of the community within its area of operation and to fully accomplish the purposes of this chapter. Such project need not be in conjunction with the clearing of a slum area under subsection (9)(a) of RCW 35.82.020 or with the providing of low-income housing under subsection (9)(b) of RCW 35.82.020.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 300 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The only section in chapter 42.32 RCW, RCW 42.32.030, was recodified as RCW 42.30.035 pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 30.